Maine, session 132, LD1399.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §405, sub-§6, ¶A, as amended by PL 2009, c. 240, §2, is further
amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) An executive session may be held only on a matter under subsection 7 or if
public discussion could be reasonably expected to cause damage to the individual's
reputation or the individual's right to privacy would be violated;
Sec. 2. 1 MRSA §405, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Violation of confidentiality of executive session matter. A member of a body or
agency falling within this subchapter or any other person attending an executive session
may not disclose a matter, including discussion, underlying facts or information regarding
the matter discussed in the executive session under subsection 4 without the approval of a
recorded vote of 3/5 of the members present and voting. If an allegation of a violation of
confidentiality under this subsection or otherwise unauthorized disclosure of a matter
discussed in an executive session is made, the body or agency may conduct the following
procedure:
A. By recorded vote of a majority of the members present and voting, initiate an
investigation of the allegation;
B. Form an ethics committee composed of members to conduct the investigation, the
underlying facts, discussion and findings of which are confidential;
C. Conduct a hearing to adjudicate the allegation, which must be held in executive
session pursuant to subsection 6, paragraph A; and
D. If, by a preponderance of the evidence at the hearing under paragraph C, the body
or agency determines that a member or other person present at an executive session
violated the confidentiality provision of this subsection, prohibit, by a recorded vote of
2/3 of the members present and voting, the member or other person found in violation
of this subsection from:
(1) Participating in a future executive session;
(2) Having access to confidential information; or
(3) Having access to information or attending an executive session regarding a
specific matter in which the body or agency determines that the member or other
person has a conflict of interest.
A prohibition under this paragraph may be for a definite or indefinite period.
The member or other person prohibited from attending an executive session or having
access to information under this paragraph may appeal the decision to the body or
agency immediately after the decision is made and every 30 days thereafter.
A decision made by the body or agency under this paragraph may be appealed to the
Superior Court.
A decision by the body or agency under this paragraph may be rescinded by a recorded
vote of 2/3 of the members present and voting or upon the expiration of the terms of
2/3 of the members who participated in the vote under this paragraph.
Page 1 - 132LR2224(01)